Vermont, session 2025-2026, S206.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
12 Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 122 is amended to read:
13 § 122. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONALREGULATION
14 The Office of Professional Regulation is created within the Office of the
15 Secretary of State. The Office shall have a director who shall be qualified by
16 education and professional experience to perform the duties of the position.
17 The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall be a classified
18 position with the Office of the Secretary of State. The following boards or
19 professions are attached to the Office of Professional Regulation:
20 (1) Board of Architects

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 2 of 25
1 * * *
2 (55) Early Childhood Educators
3 Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. chapter 111 is added to read:
4 CHAPTER 111. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS IN PROGRAMS
5 REGULATED BY THE CHILD DEVELOPMENT DIVISION
6 § 6211. CREATION OF BOARD
7 (a) The Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators is created.
8 (b) The Board shall consist of nine members appointed for five-year terms
9 by the Governor pursuant to 3 V.S.A. §§ 129b and 2004 as follows: two
10 public members; two each of individuals licensed as an Early Childhood
11 Educator I, an Early Childhood Educator II, and an Early Childhood Educator
12 III; and one Family Child Care Provider. All members shall be Vermont
13 residents. The members who are early childhood educators shall have been in
14 active practice in Vermont for not less than the preceding three years and shall
15 be in active practice during their incumbency. The public members shall be
16 individuals who have no financial interest personally or through a spouse,
17 parent, child, or sibling in the activities regulated under this chapter, other than
18 as a consumer or a possible consumer of its services. Appointments shall be
19 made without regard to political affiliation and on the basis of integrity and
20 demonstrated ability.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 3 of 25
1 (c) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as initial appointments.
2 (d) Board members shall not serve more than two consecutive terms.
3 § 6212. BOARD PROCEDURES
4 (a) Annually, the Board shall meet to elect a chair, vice chair, and a
5 secretary.
6 (b) Meetings shall be warned and conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A.
7 chapter 5.
8 (c) A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.
9 (d) All business shall be transacted by a majority vote of the members
10 present and voting, unless otherwise provided by statute.
11 § 6213. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE BOARD
12 (a) The Board shall:
13 (1) adopt rules, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, that are necessary for
14 the performance of its duties in accordance with this chapter, including
15 activities that must be completed by an applicant in order to fulfill the
16 educational and experiential requirements established by this chapter;
17 (2) provide general information to applicants for licensure as early
18 childhood educators;
19 (3) explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint
20 procedures to the public; and

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 4 of 25
1 (4) use the administrative and legal services provided by the Office of
2 Professional Regulation under 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.
3 (b) The Board may conduct hearings and exercise its authority as provided
4 in 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.
5 Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. chapter 111 is amended to read:
6 CHAPTER 111. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS IN PROGRAMS
7 REGULATED BY THE CHILD DEVELOPMENT DIVISION
8 Subchapter 1. General Provisions
9 § 6201. DEFINITIONS
10 As used in this chapter:
11 (1) “Board” means the Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators.
12 (2) “Early childhood educator” means an individual providing care and
13 educational instruction to children from birth through eight years of age in a
14 program regulated by the Child Development Division, including:
15 (A) planning and implementing intentional, developmentally
16 appropriate learning experiences that promote the physical health and social,
17 emotional, linguistic, and cognitive growth of children;
18 (B) establishing and maintaining a safe, caring, inclusive, and
19 healthy learning environment;
20 (C) observing, documenting, and assessing children’s learning and
21 development;

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 5 of 25
1 (D) developing reciprocal, culturally responsive relationships with
2 families and communities; and
3 (E) engaging in reflective practice and continuous learning.
4 (3) “Early Childhood Educator I” means an individual who practices
5 early childhood education as an assistant educator in a program under the
6 supervision of Early Childhood Educators II or III or a teacher who is exempt
7 from this chapter and licensed by the Agency of Education under 16 V.S.A.
8 chapter 51 with endorsements in early childhood education, early childhood
9 special education, or elementary education.
10 (4) “Early Childhood Educator II” means an individual who practices
11 early childhood education as the lead or primary educator in a program,
12 supervises the practice of individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator
13 I, and receives guidance from individuals licensed as an Early Childhood
14 Educator III.
15 (5) “Early Childhood Educator III” means an individual who practices
16 early childhood education as the lead or primary educator in a program,
17 supervises the practice of individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator
18 I, and provides guidance to individuals licensed as an Early Childhood
19 Educator II.
20 (6) “Family child care provider” means an individual who provides
21 developmentally appropriate care, education, protection, and supervision of

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 6 of 25
1 children from birth through eight years of age and is authorized by the Child
2 Development Division to operate a family child care home as defined in 33
3 V.S.A. § 3511.
4 (7) “Guidance” means direct or indirect consultative support in which
5 an Early Childhood Educator III provides feedback to an Early Childhood
6 Educator II.
7 (8) “Program” or “program regulated by the Child Development
8 Division” means a program or facility approved by the Department for
9 Children and Families’ Child Development Division as a licensed or registered
10 family child care home or a licensed center-based child care and preschool
11 program.
12 (9) “Supervision” means on-site, direct oversight in which an Early
13 Childhood Educator II or III observes the practice of an Early Childhood
14 Educator I and provides feedback, support, and direction to an Early
15 Childhood Educator I.
16 § 6202. PROHIBITIONS
17 (a) An individual shall not hold themselves out as an early childhood
18 educator in this State unless the individual is licensed under this chapter or
19 exempt from this chapter pursuant to section 6203 of this chapter.
20 (b) An individual shall not use in connection with the individual’s name
21 any letters, words, or insignia indicating that the individual is an early

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 7 of 25
1 childhood educator unless the individual is licensed under this chapter or
2 exempt from this chapter pursuant to section 6203 of this chapter.
3 § 6203. EXEMPTIONS
4 (a) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following persons
5 acting within the scope of their respective professional practices:
6 (1) a teacher actively licensed under 16 V.S.A. chapter 51 by the
7 Agency of Education with endorsements in early childhood education, an early
8 childhood special education, or an elementary education; and
9 (2) an individual who provides care in an afterschool child care program
10 that is regulated by the Child Development Division or any other child care
11 program that is exempt from regulation by the Child Development Division.
12 (b) This chapter shall not be construed to alter or amend the requirements
13 of publicly funded prekindergarten education programs operated in accordance
14 with 16 V.S.A. § 829.
15 (c) This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict in any manner the
16 right of a practitioner of another profession or occupation from carrying on in
17 the usual manner any of the functions incidental to that profession or
18 occupation.
19 Subchapter 2. Board of Early Childhood Educators
20 § 6211. CREATION OF BOARD
21 * * *

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 8 of 25
1 Subchapter 3. Licensure Requirements
2 § 6221. ELIGIBILITY AND QUALIFICATIONS
3 (a) To be eligible for licensure under this chapter, an applicant shall have
4 attained the age of majority; achieved a high school diploma, a General
5 Education Development (GED) certificate, or an approved equivalent
6 credential; and completed field experience in early childhood education as
7 required by rule.
8 (b) An applicant shall meet the following educational requirements for
9 each of the following license types:
10 (1) Early Childhood Educator I shall have received a certificate from an
11 approved credential program in early childhood education requiring a
12 minimum of 120 hours of training and instruction.
13 (2) Early Childhood Educator II shall have received an associate’s
14 degree program in:
15 (A) early childhood education or a related field requiring a minimum
16 of 60 college credits; or
17 (B) any unrelated field and a minimum of 21 approved college
18 credits in the core early childhood education competency areas identified in
19 rule.
20 (3) Early Childhood Educator III shall have received a bachelor’s
21 degree from an approved program in:

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 9 of 25
1 (A) early childhood education or a related field requiring a minimum
2 of 120 college credits; or
3 (B) any unrelated field and a minimum of 21 approved college
4 credits in the core early childhood education competency areas identified in
5 rule.
6 (4) A Family Child Care Provider shall be qualified for licensure if
7 authorized by the Child Development Division to operate a family child care
8 home and is in good standing with the Division as of January 1, 2029. The
9 Board shall not accept Family Child Care Provider applications after January
10 1, 2029.
11 (c) Approved educational programs may offer college credit based upon an
12 assessment of the individual’s competencies acquired through experience
13 working in the profession.
14 (d) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this
15 section, applicants shall pass any examination that may be required by rule.
16 § 6222. LICENSE RENEWAL
17 (a) Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon application and
18 payment of the required fee. Failure to comply with the provisions of this
19 section shall result in suspension of all privileges granted by the license
20 beginning on the expiration date of the license. A license that has lapsed shall
21 be reinstated upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and the late renewal

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 10 of 25
1 penalty pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 127, except a Family Child Care Provider
2 license shall not be renewed after a lapse of two or more years.
3 (b) The Board may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 necessary
4 for the protection of the public to assure the Board that an applicant whose
5 license has lapsed for more than five years is professionally qualified before
6 reinstatement may occur. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall be in
7 addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
8 (c) In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an
9 applicant for renewal shall have satisfactorily completed continuing education
10 as required by the Board. For purposes of this subsection, the Board may
11 require, by rule, not more than 24 hours of approved continuing education as a
12 condition of renewal.
13 § 6223. FEES
14 Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following
15 fees:
16 (1) Early Childhood Educator I:
17 (A) Application for initial license, $125.00.
18 (B) Biennial renewal, $225.00.
19 (2) Early Childhood Educator II:
20 (A) Application for initial license, $175.00.
21 (B) Biennial renewal, $250.00.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 11 of 25
1 (3) Early Childhood Educator III:
2 (A) Application for initial license, $225.00.
3 (B) Biennial renewal, $275.00.
4 (4) Family Child Care Provider:
5 (A) Application for initial license, $175.00.
6 (B) Biennial renewal, $250.00.
7 § 6224. UNPROFESSIONALCONDUCT
8 As used in this chapter, “unprofessional conduct” means:
9 (1) conduct prohibited by this section, by 3 V.S.A. § 129a, or by other
10 statutes relating to early childhood education, whether that conduct is by a
11 licensee, an applicant, or an individual who later becomes an applicant;
12 (2) conduct that results in a licensee, applicant, or an individual who
13 later becomes an applicant being placed on the Child Protection Registry
14 pursuant to 33 V.S.A. chapter 49; or
15 (3) conduct that is not in accordance with the professional standards and
16 competencies for Early Childhood Educators published by the National
17 Association for the Education of Young Children.
18 § 6225. VARIANCES; TRANSITIONALLICENSURE
19 (a) The Board shall issue a transitional Early Childhood Educator II or III
20 license to a teacher or director of a program who does not meet the educational
21 and experiential licensure in this chapter. Transitional licenses shall be valid

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 12 of 25
1 for a two-year period and shall be renewed by the Board for an otherwise
2 qualified applicant for an additional two-year period with satisfactory
3 supporting documentation of the individual’s ongoing work to obtain the
4 required educational and experiential qualifications for licensure under this
5 chapter.
6 (b) At the conclusion of three two-year transitional licensure periods, the
7 Board, at its discretion, may issue one final two-year transitional license for an
8 otherwise qualified applicant if the licensee can demonstrate extenuating
9 circumstances for not having attained the educational and experiential
10 requirements in this chapter and ongoing work to attain these requirements.
11 § 6226. DISCLOSURE BY LICENSEES
12 An early childhood educator licensed pursuant to this chapter shall post and
13 provide to current and prospective families the following information:
14 (1) all available license types regulated by the Office of Professional
15 Regulation pursuant to this chapter;
16 (2) a description of the Office of Professional Regulation’s regulatory
17 authority over licensees in programs regulated by the Child Development
18 Division and how to make complaints;
19 (3) a description of the Agency of Education’s regulatory authority over
20 teachers providing prekindergarten services pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 829 and
21 how to make complaints; and

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 13 of 25
1 (4) a description of the Child Development Division’s regulatory
2 authority over regulated child care programs and how to make complaints.
3 Sec. 4. REPEAL; TRANSITIONALLICENSE
4 26 V.S.A. § 6225 (variances; transitional licensure) is repealed on July 1,
5 2036.
6 Sec. 5. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONALREGULATION; LICENSURE OF
7 EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS IN PROGRAMS
8 REGULATED BY THE CHILD DEVELOPMENT DIVISION;
9 APPROPRIATION
10 (a)(1) The establishment of the following new permanent positions is
11 authorized in the Office of Professional Regulation in fiscal year 2027:
12 (A) one full-time, classified executive officer for the Vermont Board
13 of Early Childhood Educators; and
14 (B) one full-time, exempt staff attorney.
15 (2) In fiscal year 2027, the amount of $262,000.00 is appropriated from
16 the General Fund to the Office of the Professional Regulation to be used for
17 the licensure of early childhood educators in accordance with this act.
18 (b)(1) It is the intent of the General Assembly to establish the following
19 three new permanent positions in the Office of Professional Responsibility in
20 fiscal year 2028:

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 14 of 25
1 (A) one full-time, classified licensing staff;
2 (B) one full-time, classified enforcement staff; and
3 (C) one full-time, classified administrative staff.
4 (2) It is the intent of the General Assembly to appropriate $628,867.00
5 from the General Fund in fiscal year 2028 to the Office of Professional
6 Regulation to be used for the licensure of early childhood educators in
7 accordance with this act.
8 (c) It is the intent of the General Assembly that in fiscal year 2028,
9 $1,400,000.00 be distributed from the Child Care Financial Assistance
10 Program to the Office of Professional Regulation for the initial licensure
11 application fees and licensure renewal fees for early childhood educators
12 practicing in programs regulated by the Child Development Division pursuant
13 to 26 V.S.A. chapter 111.
14 Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATES
15 (a) This section, Sec. 1 (Office of Professional Regulation), Sec. 2
16 (Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators), and Sec. 5 (Office of
17 Professional Regulation; licensure of early childhood educators; appropriation)
18 shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
19 (b) Sec. 3 (early childhood educators) and Sec. 4 (repeal; transitional
20 license) shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 122 is amended to read:
§ 122. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 15 of 25
The Office of Professional Regulation is created within the Office of the
Secretary of State. The Office shall have a director who shall be qualified by
education and professional experience to perform the duties of the position.
The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall be a classified
position with the Office of the Secretary of State. The following boards or
professions are attached to the Office of Professional Regulation:
(1) Board of Architects
* * *
(55) Early Childhood Educators
Sec. 2. 26 V.S.A. chapter 111 is added to read:
CHAPTER 111. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS IN PROGRAMS
REGULATED BY THE CHILD DEVELOPMENT DIVISION
§ 6211. CREATION OF BOARD
(a) The Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators is created.
(b) The Board shall consist of nine members appointed for five-year terms
by the Governor pursuant to 3 V.S.A. §§ 129b and 2004 as follows: two public
members; two each of individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator I,
an Early Childhood Educator II, and an Early Childhood Educator III; and
one Family Child Care Provider. All members shall be Vermont residents. The
members who are early childhood educators shall have been in active practice
in Vermont for not less than the preceding three years and shall be in active
practice during their incumbency. The public members shall be individuals
who have no financial interest personally or through a spouse, parent, child, or
sibling in the activities regulated under this chapter, other than as a consumer
or a possible consumer of its services. Appointments shall be made without
regard to political affiliation and on the basis of integrity and demonstrated
ability.
(c) Vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as initial appointments.
(d) Board members shall not serve more than two consecutive terms.
§ 6212. BOARD PROCEDURES
(a) Annually, the Board shall meet to elect a chair, vice chair, and a
secretary.
(b) Meetings shall be warned and conducted in accordance with 1 V.S.A.
chapter 5.
(c) A majority of the members of the Board shall constitute a quorum.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 16 of 25
(d) All business shall be transacted by a majority vote of the members
present and voting, unless otherwise provided by statute.
§ 6213. POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE BOARD
(a) The Board shall:
(1) adopt rules, pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, that are necessary for
the performance of its duties in accordance with this chapter, including
activities that must be completed by an applicant in order to fulfill the
educational and experiential requirements established by this chapter;
(2) provide general information to applicants for licensure as early
childhood educators;
(3) explain appeal procedures to licensees and applicants and complaint
procedures to the public; and
(4) use the administrative and legal services provided by the Office of
Professional Regulation under 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.
(b) The Board may conduct hearings and exercise its authority as provided
in 3 V.S.A. chapter 5.
Sec. 3. 26 V.S.A. chapter 111 is amended to read:
CHAPTER 111. EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS IN PROGRAMS
REGULATED BY THE CHILD DEVELOPMENT DIVISION
Subchapter 1. General Provisions
§ 6201. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Board” means the Vermont Board of Early Childhood Educators.
(2) “Early childhood educator” means an individual providing care and
educational instruction to children from birth through eight years of age in a
program regulated by the Child Development Division, including:
(A) planning and implementing intentional, developmentally
appropriate learning experiences that promote the physical health and social,
emotional, linguistic, and cognitive growth of children;
(B) establishing and maintaining a safe, caring, inclusive, and
healthy learning environment;
(C) observing, documenting, and assessing children’s learning and
development;

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 17 of 25
(D) developing reciprocal, culturally responsive relationships with
families and communities; and
(E) engaging in reflective practice and continuous learning.
(3) “Early Childhood Educator I” means an individual who practices
early childhood education as an assistant educator in a program under the
supervision of Early Childhood Educators II or III or a teacher who is exempt
from this chapter and licensed by the Agency of Education under 16 V.S.A.
chapter 51 with endorsements in early childhood education, early childhood
special education, or elementary education.
(4) “Early Childhood Educator II” means an individual who practices
early childhood education as the lead or primary educator in a program,
supervises the practice of individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator
I, and receives guidance from individuals licensed as an Early Childhood
Educator III.
(5) “Early Childhood Educator III” means an individual who practices
early childhood education as the lead or primary educator in a program,
supervises the practice of individuals licensed as an Early Childhood Educator
I, and provides guidance to individuals licensed as an Early Childhood
Educator II.
(6) “Family child care provider” means an individual who provides
developmentally appropriate care, education, protection, and supervision of
children from birth through eight years of age and is authorized by the Child
Development Division to operate a family child care home as defined in 33
V.S.A. § 3511.
(7) “Guidance” means direct or indirect consultative support in which
an Early Childhood Educator III provides feedback to an Early Childhood
Educator II.
(8) “Program” or “program regulated by the Child Development
Division” means a program or facility approved by the Department for
Children and Families’ Child Development Division as a licensed or registered
family child care home or a licensed center-based child care and preschool
program and is not operated by a public school.
(9) “Supervision” means on-site, direct oversight in which an Early
Childhood Educator II or III observes the practice of an Early Childhood
Educator I and provides feedback, support, and direction to an Early
Childhood Educator I.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 18 of 25
§ 6202. PROHIBITIONS
(a) An individual shall not hold themselves out as an early childhood
educator in this State unless the individual is licensed under this chapter or
exempt from this chapter pursuant to section 6203 of this chapter.
(b) An individual shall not use in connection with the individual’s name
any letters, words, or insignia indicating that the individual is an early
childhood educator unless the individual is licensed under this chapter or
exempt from this chapter pursuant to section 6203 of this chapter.
§ 6203. EXEMPTIONS
(a) The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following persons
acting within the scope of their respective professional practices:
(1) a teacher actively licensed under 16 V.S.A. chapter 51 by the Agency
of Education with endorsements in early childhood education, an early
childhood special education, or an elementary education;
(2) an individual who provides care in an afterschool child care
program that is regulated by the Child Development Division or any other
child care program that is exempt from regulation by the Child Development
Division; and
(3) an individual who works exclusively in a public school.
(b) This chapter shall not be construed to alter or amend the requirements
of publicly funded prekindergarten education programs operated in
accordance with 16 V.S.A. § 829.
(c) This chapter shall not be construed to limit or restrict in any manner
the right of a practitioner of another profession or occupation from carrying
on in the usual manner any of the functions incidental to that profession or
occupation.
Subchapter 2. Board of Early Childhood Educators
§ 6211. CREATION OF BOARD
* * *
Subchapter 3. Licensure Requirements
§ 6221. ELIGIBILITY AND QUALIFICATIONS
(a) To be eligible for licensure under this chapter, an applicant shall have
attained the age of majority; achieved a high school diploma, a General
Education Development (GED) certificate, or an approved equivalent
credential; and completed field experience in early childhood education as
required by rule.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 19 of 25
(b) An applicant shall meet the following educational requirements for
each of the following license types:
(1) Early Childhood Educator I shall have received a certificate from an
approved credential program in early childhood education requiring a
minimum of 120 hours of training and instruction.
(2) Early Childhood Educator II shall have received an associate’s
degree program in:
(A) early childhood education or a related field requiring a minimum
of 60 college credits; or
(B) any unrelated field and a minimum of 21 approved college credits
in the core early childhood education competency areas identified in rule.
(3) Early Childhood Educator III shall have received a bachelor’s
degree from an approved program in:
(A) early childhood education or a related field requiring a minimum
of 120 college credits; or
(B) any unrelated field and a minimum of 21 approved college credits
in the core early childhood education competency areas identified in rule.
(4) A Family Child Care Provider shall be qualified for licensure if
authorized by the Child Development Division to operate a family child care
home and is in good standing with the Division as of January 1, 2029. The
Board shall not accept Family Child Care Provider applications after January
1, 2029.
(c) Approved educational programs may offer college credit based upon an
assessment of the individual’s competencies acquired through experience
working in the profession.
(d) In addition to the requirements of subsections (a) and (b) of this
section, applicants shall pass any examination that may be required by rule.
§ 6222. LICENSE RENEWAL
(a) Licenses shall be renewed every two years upon application and
payment of the required fee. Failure to comply with the provisions of this
section shall result in suspension of all privileges granted by the license
beginning on the expiration date of the license. A license that has lapsed shall
be reinstated upon payment of the biennial renewal fee and the late renewal
penalty pursuant to 3 V.S.A. § 127, except a Family Child Care Provider
license shall not be renewed after a lapse of two or more years.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 20 of 25
(b) The Board may adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 necessary
for the protection of the public to assure the Board that an applicant whose
license has lapsed for more than five years is professionally qualified before
reinstatement may occur. Conditions imposed under this subsection shall be in
addition to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) In addition to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, an
applicant for renewal shall have satisfactorily completed continuing education
as required by the Board. For purposes of this subsection, the Board may
require, by rule, not more than 24 hours of approved continuing education as a
condition of renewal.
§ 6223. FEES
Applicants and persons regulated under this chapter shall pay the following
fees:
(1) Early Childhood Educator I:
(A) Application for initial license, $125.00.
(B) Biennial renewal, $225.00.
(2) Early Childhood Educator II:
(A) Application for initial license, $175.00.
(B) Biennial renewal, $250.00.
(3) Early Childhood Educator III:
(A) Application for initial license, $225.00.
(B) Biennial renewal, $275.00.
(4) Family Child Care Provider:
(A) Application for initial license, $175.00.
(B) Biennial renewal, $250.00.
§ 6224. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
As used in this chapter, “unprofessional conduct” means:
(1) conduct prohibited by this section, by 3 V.S.A. § 129a, or by other
statutes relating to early childhood education, whether that conduct is by a
licensee, an applicant, or an individual who later becomes an applicant;
(2) conduct that results in a licensee, applicant, or an individual who
later becomes an applicant being placed on the Child Protection Registry
pursuant to 33 V.S.A. chapter 49; or

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 21 of 25
(3) conduct that is not in accordance with the professional standards
and competencies for Early Childhood Educators published by the National
Association for the Education of Young Children.
§ 6225. VARIANCES
(a)(1) The Board shall issue a transitional Early Childhood Educator II or
III license to a teacher or director of a program who does not meet the
educational and experiential licensure in this chapter. Transitional licenses
shall be valid for a two-year period and shall be renewed by the Board for an
otherwise qualified applicant for an additional two-year period with
satisfactory supporting documentation of the individual’s ongoing work to
obtain the required educational and experiential qualifications for licensure
under this chapter.
(2) At the conclusion of three two-year transitional licensure periods,
the Board, at its discretion, may issue one final two-year transitional license
for an otherwise qualified applicant if the licensee can demonstrate
extenuating circumstances for not having attained the educational and
experiential requirements in this chapter and ongoing work to attain these
requirements.
(b) In addition to the transitional licensure available pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the Board shall also issue an Early Childhood
Educator II license for individuals who have completed the eligibility
requirements set forth in subsections 6221(a) and (d) of this chapter and
completed one of the following:
(1) 21 college credits in the core early childhood education competency
areas identified by the Board in rule; or
(2) prior experiential learning that is assessed by an appropriately
accredited institution of higher learning to be the equivalent of 21 college
credits in the core early childhood education competency areas identified by
the Board in rule.
§ 6226. DISCLOSURE BY LICENSEES
An early childhood educator licensed pursuant to this chapter shall post
and provide to current and prospective families the following information:
(1) all available license types regulated by the Office of Professional
Regulation pursuant to this chapter;
(2) a description of the Office of Professional Regulation’s regulatory
authority over licensees in programs regulated by the Child Development
Division and how to make complaints;

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 22 of 25
(3) a description of the Agency of Education’s regulatory authority over
teachers providing prekindergarten services pursuant to 16 V.S.A. § 829 and
how to make complaints; and
(4) a description of the Child Development Division’s regulatory
authority over regulated child care programs and how to make complaints.
Sec. 4. REPEAL; VARIANCES
26 V.S.A. § 6225 (variances) is repealed on July 1, 2036.
Sec. 4. 26 V.S.A. § 6225 is amended to read:
§ 6225. VARIANCES
(a)(1) The Board shall issue a transitional Early Childhood Educator II or
III license to a teacher or director of a program who does not meet the
educational and experiential licensure in this chapter. Transitional licenses
issued under this subsection shall be valid for a two-year period and shall be
renewed by the Board for an otherwise qualified applicant for an additional
two-year period with satisfactory supporting documentation of the individual’s
ongoing work to obtain the required educational and experiential
qualifications for licensure under this chapter.
* * *
(c) The Board shall issue a transitional Early Childhood Educator II
license to a provider operating a family child care home who does not meet the
educational and experiential licensure requirements of an Early Childhood
Educator II but does meet the educational and experiential license
requirements of an Early Childhood Educator I pursuant to this chapter.
Transitional licenses under this subsection shall be valid for a two-year period,
and renewable for two additional two-year periods, while the licensee
completes ongoing work to obtain the required educational and experiential
qualifications for Early Childhood II licensure under this chapter.
Sec. 4a. 26 V.S.A. § 6225 is amended to read:
§ 6225. VARIANCES
(a)(1) The Board shall issue a transitional Early Childhood Educator II or
III license to a teacher or director of a program who does not meet the
educational and experiential licensure in this chapter. Transitional licenses
issued under this subsection shall be valid for a two-year period and shall be
renewed by the Board for an otherwise qualified applicant for an additional
two-year period with satisfactory supporting documentation of the individual’s
ongoing work to obtain the required educational and experiential
qualifications for licensure under this chapter.

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 23 of 25
(2) At the conclusion of three two-year transitional licensure periods,
the Board, at its discretion, may issue one final two-year transitional license
for an otherwise qualified applicant if the licensee can demonstrate
extenuating circumstances for not having attained the educational and
experiential requirements in this chapter and ongoing work to attain these
requirements.
(b) In addition to the transitional licensure available pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section, the Board shall also issue an Early Childhood
Educator II license for individuals who have completed the eligibility
requirements set forth in subsections 6221(a) and (d) of this chapter and
completed one of the following:
(1) 21 college credits in the core early childhood education competency
areas identified by the Board in rule; or
(2) prior experiential learning that is assessed by an appropriately
accredited institution of higher learning to be the equivalent of 21 college
credits in the core early childhood education competency areas identified by
the Board in rule.
(c) The Board shall issue a transitional Early Childhood Educator II
license to a provider operating a family child care home who does not meet the
educational and experiential licensure requirements of an Early Childhood
Educator II but does meet the educational and experiential license
requirements of an Early Childhood Educator I pursuant to this chapter.
Transitional licenses under this subsection shall be valid for a two-year period,
and renewable for two additional two-year periods, while the licensee
completes ongoing work to obtain the required educational and experiential
qualifications for Early Childhood II licensure under this chapter.
Sec. 5. REPORT; EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR LICENSURE
On or before November 1, 2031, the Office of Professional Regulation shall
submit a written report to the House Committees on Government Operations
and Military Affairs and on Human Services and to the Senate Committees on
Government Operations and on Health and Welfare regarding the
implementation of 26 V.S.A. chapter 111, including:
(1) the number of licensees by license type;
(2) the State resources necessary to implement the chapter;
(3) the number and nature of any complaints or enforcement actions
against a licensee;
(4) the qualifications required for each license type; and

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 24 of 25
(5) any other issues the Office deems appropriate.
Sec. 5. REPORT; EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATOR LICENSURE
On or before November 1, 2031, the Office of Professional Regulation, in
consultation with the Department for Children and Families’ Child
Development Division, shall submit a written report to the House Committees
on Government Operations and Military Affairs and on Human Services and to
the Senate Committees on Government Operations and on Health and Welfare
regarding the implementation of 26 V.S.A. chapter 111, including:
(1) the number of licensees by license type;
(2) the State resources necessary to implement the chapter;
(3) the number and nature of any complaints or enforcement actions
against a licensee;
(4) the qualifications required for each license type;
(5) any changes in the number of registered and licensed family child
care homes since the enactment of 26 V.S.A. chapter 111;
(6) recommendations to encourage the opening of additional family
child care homes; and
(7) any other issues the Office deems appropriate.
Sec. 6. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION; LICENSURE OF
EARLY CHILDHOOD EDUCATORS IN PROGRAMS
REGULATED BY THE CHILD DEVELOPMENT DIVISION;
APPROPRIATION; POSITIONS
(a) The establishment of the following new permanent positions is
authorized in the Office of Professional Regulation in fiscal year 2027:
(1) one full-time, classified executive officer for the Vermont Board of
Early Childhood Educators; and
(2) one full-time, exempt staff attorney.
(b) In fiscal year 2027, the amount of $262,000.00 is appropriated from the
General Fund to the Office of Professional Regulation to be used for the
licensure of early childhood educators in accordance with this act.
Sec. 6a. CONTIGENCY OF FUNDING
The duty to implement Sec. 6 of this act, Office of Professional Regulation;
licensure of early childhood educators in program regulated by the Child
Development Division; appropriation; positions, is contingent upon an
appropriation of funds in fiscal year 2027 from the General Fund to the Office

BILLAS INTRODUCED AND PASSED BY SENATE S.206
2026 Page 25 of 25
of Professional Regulation for the specific purposes described in Sec. 6 of this
act.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section, Sec. 1 (Office of Professional Regulation), Sec. 2 (Vermont
Board of Early Childhood Educators), Sec. 5 (report; early childhood
educator licensure), and Sec. 6 (Office of Professional Regulation; licensure of
early childhood educators; appropriation; positions) shall take effect on July
1, 2026.
(b) Sec. 3 (early childhood educators) and Sec. 4 (repeal; variances) shall
take effect on July 1, 2028.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) This section, Sec. 1 (Office of Professional Regulation), Sec. 2 (Vermont
Board of Early Childhood Educators), Sec. 5 (report; early childhood
educator licensure), and Sec. 6 (Office of Professional Regulation; licensure of
early childhood educators; appropriation; positions), Sec. 6a (contingency of
funding) shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
(b) Sec. 3 (early childhood educators) shall take effect on July 1, 2028.
(c) Sec. 4 (26 V.S.A. § 6225) shall take effect on January 1, 2029.
(d) Sec. 4a (26 V.S.A. § 6225) shall take effect on July 1, 2036.